Utah statutes.
26-8a-201.   Public awareness efforts.

The department may:

(1)  develop programs to inform the public of the emergency medical service system; and

(2)  develop and disseminate emergency medical training programs for the public, which emphasize the prevention and treatment of injuries and illnesses.

